District of Columbia statutes.
29A-418

Repealed

Perpetual existence; dissolution.

Repealed.

Dec. 10, 1971, 85 Stat. 582, Pub. L. 92-180, § 18
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(n), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-418.
1981 Ed., § 29-618.
1973 Ed., § 29-1118.